test/src/morphology/N-mwwka_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - mȭka: # Noun 48 'eng /est vorst/fin' - full paradigm
     mȭka+N+Sg+Nom: mȭka
     mȭka+N+Sg+Gen: mȭka
     mȭka+N+Sg+Par: mõukõ
     mȭka+N+Sg+Dat: mȭkan
     mȭka+N+Sg+Ins: mȭkaks
     mȭka+N+Sg+Ill: mõukõ
     mȭka+N+Sg+Ela: mȭkast
     mȭka+N+Pl+Nom: mȭkad
     mȭka+N+Pl+Gen: mȭkad
     mȭka+N+Pl+Par: mȭkidi
     mȭka+N+Pl+Dat: mȭkadõn
     mȭka+N+Pl+Ins: mȭkadõks
     mȭka+N+Pl+Ill: mȭkiž
     mȭka+N+Pl+Ela: mȭkist
